Maryland, session 2026, HB1225.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Agriculture
11–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(l) “Weight and measure” means any instrument or device used for weighing or
measuring, and any appliance or accessory associated with any instrument or device used
for weighing or measuring.
11–204.
(a) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “MASS–PRODUCED DEVICE” MEANS A DEVICE PRODUCED BY
MEANS OF A MOLD OR DIE AND NOT SUSCEPTIBLE OF INDIVIDUAL ADJUSTMENT.
(3) “SINGLE–SERVICE DEVICE” MEANS A DEVICE DESIGNED TO BE
USED COMMERCIALLY ONLY ONCE AND THEN DISCARDED.
(B) [Upon the] ON request of any competent State authority, the Secretary may
inspect and test any weight and measure.
[(b)] (C) (1) Unless otherwise provided, the Secretary may inspect and test to
ascertain if they are correct, every weight and measure possessed, offered, or exposed for
sale.
(2) The Secretary shall inspect and test every weight and measure
commercially used in determining:
[(1)] (I) The weight, measurement, or count of any commodity sold, or
offered or exposed for sale, on the basis of weight, measure, or count;

HOUSE BILL 1225 3
[(2)] (II) Any charge or payment for services rendered on the basis of
weight, measure, or count; and
[(3)] (III) Weight, measurement, or count when a charge is made for the
determination.
[(c)] (D) (1) The Secretary may test with representative samples any
single–service device or mass–produced device.
(2) The lot of which any sample is representative shall be held to be correct
or incorrect [upon] ON the basis of the results of the inspections and tests on the samples.
[For the purposes of this section, a single–service device is a device designed to be used
commercially only once and then discarded; and a mass–produced device is a device
produced by means of a mold or die and not susceptible of individual adjustment.]
[(d)] (E) The Secretary shall conduct inspections as provided in a memorandum
of understanding on behalf of and in coordination with other agencies when performing
weights and measures inspections at gasoline retailing operations.
(F) FUNDING FOR THE PURCHASE OF EQUIPMENT NECESSARY TO INSPECT
A WEIGHT AND MEASURE USED FOR THE RETAIL SALE OF ELECTRICITY AS A MOTOR
FUEL SHALL BE PROVIDED FROM THE MARYLAND STRATEGIC ENERGY
INVESTMENT FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 9–20B–05 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE.
11–204.7.
(A) [The] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, THE Secretary may
set reasonable fees for registering each weight and measure used for commercial purposes
under this subtitle.
(B) THE PER PORT FEE FOR REGISTERING A WEIGHT AND MEASURE USED
FOR THE RETAIL SALE OF ELECTRICITY AS A MOTOR FUEL MAY NOT EXCEED THE
FEE CHARGED PER METER FOR A RETAIL MOTOR FUEL DISPENSER METER.
Article – State Government
9–20B–05.
(a) There is a Maryland Strategic Energy Investment Fund.
(f) The Administration shall use the Fund:

HOUSE BILL 1225
(13) notwithstanding subsection (g) of this section, to pay costs associated
with the Air and Radiation Administration within the Department of the Environment;
[and]
(14) TO PAY COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH THE INSPECTION AND TESTING
OF WEIGHTS AND MEASURES USED FOR THE RETAIL SALE OF ELECTRICITY AS A
MOTOR FUEL UNDER § 11–204 OF THE AGRICULTURE ARTICLE; AND
[(14)] (15) to pay the expenses of the Program.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.